en: natural peppermint flavouring
bg: естествен ароматизант ментол
de: Natürliches Pfeffeeminzaroma
fi: luontainen piparminttuaromi
fr: arôme naturel de menthe poivrée
hr: prirodna aroma paprene metvice
hu: természetes borsmenta aroma
it: aroma naturale di menta piperita
pl: naturalny aromat mięty pieprzowej
sv: naturlig pepparmintsarom

en: natural peppermint flavouring with other natural flavourings
de: natürliches Pfefferminz Aroma mit andeten natürlichen Aromen
fi: luontainen piparminttuaromi ja muita luontaisia aromeja
hr: prirodne arome mente s drugim prirodnim aromama
it: aroma naturale di menta piperita con altri aromi naturali
sv: naturlig pepparmintsarom med andra naturliga aromer

en: spearmint flavouring
da: spearmintaroma

en: natural aroma of mint and citrus
bg: естествена арома от мента и цитрус
ca: aroma natural de menta i cítrics
cs: přírodní aroma máty a citrusů
da: naturlig aroma af mynte og citrus
de: natürliches Aroma von Minze und Zitrus
es: aroma natural de menta y cítricos
fi: luonnollinen mintun ja sitrushedelmien aromi
fr: arôme naturel de menthe et d'agrumes
hr: prirodna aroma mente i citrusa
hu: természetes menta és citrus aroma
it: aroma naturale di menta e agrumi
nl: natuurlijk aroma van munt en citrus
pl: naturalny aromat mięty i cytrusów
pt: aroma natural de menta e citrinos
ro: aroma naturală de mentă și citrice
sv: naturlig arom av mynta och citrus

en: natural menthol flavouring
da: naturlig mentolaroma

en: smoke flavouring, smoke flavour, aroma of smoke, smoked flavour
bg: пушилен ароматизант
ca: aroma de fum
cs: kouřové aroma
da: røgaroma
de: Raucharoma
es: aroma de humo, humo de madera
fi: savuaromi, savuaromia
fr: arôme de fumée, arôme fumé, arôme fumée, aromes de fumee, saveur de fumée
hr: aroma dima
hu: füst aroma, füst ízesétés, füst íz
it: aroma di affumicato, aroma di affumicatura, affumicatura
nb: røykaroma
nl: rookaroma, rookaroma's
pl: aromat dymu wędzarniczego, aromat dymu
pt: aroma de fumo
ro: aroma de fum
sv: rökarom

en: natural smoke flavouring, natural smoked flavouring
bg: естествен пушек
de: natürliches Raucharoma
es: Saborizante de humo natural
fr: arôme naturel de fumée, arôme de fumée naturel
hr: prirodna aroma dima
it: Aroma di fumo naturale
nl: natuurlijk rookaroma
pl: Naturalny aromat dymu wędzarnianego

fr: arôme naturel de noisette
fi: hasselpähkinäaromi
hu: természetes mogyoró aroma

en: natural almond flavouring
de: natürliches Mandelaroma
es: aroma natural de almendra
fi: luontainen manteliaromi
fr: arôme naturel d'amande
hr: prirodna aroma badema
hu: természetes mandula aroma
it: aroma naturale di mandorle
pl: naturalny aromat migdałowy
pt: aroma natural de amêndoa

en: natural bitter almond flavouring
de: natürliches Bittermandelaroma, natürliches Bittermandel-Aroma
fr: arôme naturel d'amande amère
hr: prirodna aroma kiselog badema
it: aroma naturale di mandorle amare

en: bitter almond extract
de: Bittermandel-Extrakt
fr: extrait d'amande amère
it: estratto di mandorle amare

en: caramel flavouring
da: karamelaroma
de: Karamellaroma, Karamell-Aroma
es: Sabor caramelo
fi: karamelliaromi, toffeearomi
fr: arôme caramel
hr: aroma karamele
hu: karamella aroma, karamell aroma
it: aroma di caramello
nl: karamel aroma, caramelaroma
pt: aroma de caramelo
sv: kolaarom

en: natural pork flavouring
de: natürliches Schweinefleischaroma, natürliches Schweinefleisch-Aroma
es: sabor natural de cerdo
fi: luontainen sianliha-aromi
fr: arôme naturel de porc
hr: prirodna aroma svinjetine
hu: természetes sertéshús aroma
it: aroma naturale di maiale
nl: natuurlijk karamel aroma, natuurlijk varkensvleesaroma
pt: sabor natural de porco
ro: aromă naturală de porc
sv: naturlig fläskarom

en: bacon flavouring
bg: аромат на бекон
ca: aroma de bacó
cs: slanina aroma
da: baconsmag
de: Speckgeschmack
es: sabor a tocino
fi: pekoniaromi
fr: arôme bacon
hr: okus slanine
hu: szalonna íz
it: aroma di bacon
nl: baconaroma
pl: aromat boczku
pt: sabor de bacon
ro: aromă de bacon
sk: aróma slaniny
sl: okus slanine
sv: baconarom
tr: domuz pastırması aroması

en: natural garlic flavouring, natural garlic aroma
bg: натурален аромат на чесън
ca: Aroma natural d'all
de: natürliches Knoblaucharoma
es: Aroma natural de ajo
fi: luontainen valkosipuliaromi
fr: arôme naturel d'ail
hr: prirodna aroma češnjaka
hu: természetes fokhagyma aroma
it: Aroma naturale d'aglio
ml: natuurlijk knoflookaroma
pl: naturalny aromat czosnku, naturalny aromat czosnkowy

en: vanillin flavour, natural identical vanillin
ca: aroma de vanil·lina, aroma natural de vanil·lina
de: Aroma Vanillin
fi: vanilliiniaromi
fr: arôme vanilline
hu: vanillin aroma
it: aroma di vanillina, aroma vanillina, aroma (vanillina)
lt: kvapioji medžiaga vanilinas, aromatizatorius vanilinas
pl: aromat wanilinowy
sv: vanillinarom

en: caffeine flavour, caffeine flavor, caffeine aroma
bg: ароматизант кофеин
da: koffein aroma
de: Koffeinaroma, Aroma Koffein
es: aroma de cafeína
fi: kofeiiniaromi
fr: arôme caféine
hu: koffein aroma
it: aroma di caffeina, aroma caffeina, aroma (caffeina)
lv: kofeīna garša
nl: cafeïnearoma
pl: aromat kofeiny
pt: aroma de cafeína
sv: koffein arom

en: aniseed aroma
de: Anisaroma
es: aroma de anís
fi: anisaromi
fr: arôme d'anis
hr: aroma anisa
hu: ánizs aroma
it: aroma di anice
nl: anijsaroma

en: natural star anise aroma
de: natürliches Sternanisaroma
fi: luontainen tähtianisaromi
fr: arôme naturel d'anis étoilé
hr: prirodna aroma zvjezdastog anisa
hu: természetes csillagánizs aroma
it: aroma naturale di anice stellato

en: natural aniseed aroma
de: natürliches Anisaroma, natürliches Anis-Aroma
fi: luontainen anisaromi
fr: arôme naturel d'anis
hr: prirodna aroma anisa
hu: természetes ánizs aroma
it: aroma naturale di anice
nl: natuurlijk anijsaroma
sv: naturlig anisarom